Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,250
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the New Taxpayer Recruitment Grant Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;

(2) Household means one or more individuals who dwell together; and

(3) Household goal means the total number of households that a new taxpayer recruitment program seeks to successfully incentivize to relocate or commit to relocate from a location that is outside of this state to a municipality in this state.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 110.
July 18, 2026